Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 8 Regulation of Sales
3-8-10.
Possession of beverage by underage persons.

Any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday and has in his or her possession any beverage as defined in this title shall be fined one hundred fifty dollars ($150) to seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) for the first offense, three hundred dollars ($300) to seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) for the second offense, and four hundred fifty dollars ($450) to nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) for the third or subsequent offense. In addition, any person who violates this section shall be required to perform thirty (30) hours of community service and shall be subject to a minimum sixty (60) day suspension of his or her driver’s license, and upon a second offense may be ordered to undergo a substance abuse assessment by a licensed substance abuse professional.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, §

3-8-10

; P.L. 1962, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 142, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 364, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 261, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 340, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 200, § 1.

3-8-11.
[Reserved.]

3-8-11.1.
Furnishing or procurement of alcoholic beverages for underage persons.

As used in this section: (1) “furnish” means to provide with, supply, give or purchase; (2) “procure” means to get possession of, obtain by particular care and effort; and (3) “permit” means to give permission for, or approval of, the possession or consumption of an alcoholic beverage by any form of conduct, that would cause a reasonable person to believe that permission or approval has been given.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section it is unlawful for any person twenty-one (21) years of age or older:

to purchase from any licensee or any employee of a licensee any alcoholic beverage for the sale, delivery, service of or giving away to, any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday;

to purchase from any licensee or any employee of any licensee any alcoholic beverage with the intent to cause or permit said alcoholic beverage to be sold, or given to any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday;

to knowingly furnish any alcoholic beverage for the sale, delivery, service of or giving to any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday;

to procure alcoholic beverages for the sale, delivery, service of or giving to any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday; or

to otherwise permit the consumption of alcohol by underaged persons in his or her residence or on his or her real property.

Any person, between the ages of eighteen (18) and twenty-one (21) years of age, who violates subsection (b) herein, may, upon conviction, be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500). In addition, any person convicted may be required to attend an educational program approved by the department of health designed to recognize the dangers of underaged drinking, and may be subject to up to thirty (30) hours of community service.

This section does not apply to use, consumption or possession of alcoholic beverages by a minor for religious purposes; or to a parent or legal guardian procuring or furnishing alcohol to, or permitting the consumption of alcohol by, his or her minor child or ward.

Any person who violates this section will be subject to the penalties provided in §

3-8-11.2

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, §

3-8-11.1

; P.L. 1963, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 142, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 144, § 1.

3-8-11.2.
Penalty for violation of § 3-8-11.1.

Any person who violates §

3-8-11.1

and either pleads nolo contendere or is convicted of a first misdemeanor violation shall be punished by a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) and/or imprisoned for a period not exceeding six (6) months, or both.

Any person who violates §

3-8-11.1

and either pleads nolo contendre or is convicted of a second misdemeanor violation shall be punished by a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) and/or imprisoned for a period not exceeding one year, or both.

Any person who violates §

3-8-11.1

and either pleads nolo contendre or is convicted of a third or subsequent violation shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) and/or imprisonment not exceeding three (3) years. Any person convicted of a second or subsequent offense under of this section shall not have any fine suspended.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, §

3-8-11.2

; P.L. 1963, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 78, § 12; P.L. 1988, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 200, § 1.

3-8-11.3.
Agency or misrepresentation no defense.

It is no defense to a prosecution for a violation of §

3-8-11.2

, that in the transaction upon which the prosecution is based, any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday acted as the agent or representative of another, or that the defendant dealt with any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday as the agent or representative of another, or that any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday misrepresented or misstated his or her age, or the age of any other person or misrepresented his or her age through the presentation of any of the documents set forth in of §

3-8-6(a)(3)

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, §

3-8-11.2

; P.L. 1963, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 142, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 191, § 1.

3-8-11.4.
Report of convictions involving altered or fraudulent driver’s license.

Upon final conviction of any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday of having used an altered or fraudulent driver’s license for the purposes of causing the sale to him, her, or another of alcoholic beverages, the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the cause shall, within ten (10) days of the time when the case is disposed of, cause to be sent to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles an abstract of the record of disposition of the case.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, §

3-8-11.4

; P.L. 1965, ch. 180, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 142, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 191, § 1.

3-8-12.
Expungement of certain criminal records.

The court records of conviction of any person convicted of a violation of §

3-8-6

,

3-8-9

, or

3-8-10

, while between the age of eighteen (18) to twenty-one (21) shall be expunged without the requirement of filing a motion pursuant to chapter 1.3 of title 12; provided, that all outstanding court-imposed or court-related fees, fines, costs, assessments, charges and/or any other obligations imposed by the court have been paid and/or satisfied, or are reduced or waived by order of the court. The defendant shall be advised that any and all bail money relating to a case that remains on deposit and is not claimed at the time of expungement shall be escheated to the state’s general treasury in accordance with chapter 12 of title 8.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, §

3-8-12

, as assigned, P.L. 1972, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 109, § 1.

3-8-13.
Use of alcoholic beverages in a licensed curriculum.

This chapter does not apply to a person who gives or causes to be given any alcoholic beverage to a student under the age of twenty-one (21) years, nor does this chapter apply to any of these students who receives any alcoholic beverage, if the beverage is delivered in a curriculum at an accredited college in which the student is required to taste or imbibe alcoholic beverages in courses which are part of the required curriculum, provided these alcoholic beverages are used only for instructional purposes during classes conducted pursuant to this curriculum.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 115, § 1.

3-8-14.
Sale of beverages by bottle.

The department of business regulation shall adopt rules and regulations authorizing the holders of Class B-V licenses issued pursuant to this title to sell aquardiente by the bottle, for consumption on the premises of the license holder because this beverage is generally purchased by the bottle by ethnic tradition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 202, § 1.

3-8-15.
Sales of kegs of beer — Restrictions.

Every retailer of kegs of beer shall affix a removable label to each keg of beer sold which shall contain the name, address, date of birth, type of identification document used to verify the date, and the last four (4) digits of the identification number of the document, of the person purchasing the keg and the following language: “Rhode Island law prohibits and imposes penalties for the sale, delivery, service of or giving away to, or causing, or permitting or procuring to be sold, delivered, served, or given away any alcoholic beverage to any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday. A violation of this statute is an offense punishable by a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) and six (6) months imprisonment. Minimum fine for first offense is three hundred fifty dollars ($350). The purchaser shall not remove, deface or obliterate the keg label.” A keg without a label attached shall be subject to confiscation by the police. Removing or defacing a keg label shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

The retailer shall maintain a copy of the keg label in a keg sales book and shall note on that copy whether the keg was returned with the keg label or not returned at all. The director of the department of business regulation shall develop regulations for the design and production of the keg labels. The director shall produce and issue uniform keg labels and keg sales books that shall be made available to the retailer at cost.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to those classes of licensed beverage retailers which are prohibited by law from making off premises sales.

The director of business regulation shall design a uniform keg label which fulfills the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 115, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 147, § 1.

3-8-16.
Restaurants: Off premise transportation of wine.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or in the Rhode Island general laws to the contrary, a holder of a retailer’s Class B license shall be permitted to provide to a patron, and the patron shall be allowed to retain and remove from the premises and transport the remains of any bottle of wine purchased by said patron in conjunction with a meal, subject to the following limitations and conditions:

The patron purchased said wine in conjunction with the consumption of a full-course meal, defined herein as to include no less than an entrée meal, which shall be consumed on the premises;

The license holder shall re-cork or seal said bottle of wine;

The license holder shall place the bottle of wine in a container which shall be sealed in such a way as to prevent re-opening without obvious evidence that the seal was removed or broken;

The license holder shall note the date of the meal on the container; and

No more than one bottle may be removed at any one time.

A patron who transports the remains of a bottle of wine, as provided herein, shall not be subject to the provisions of §

31-22-21.1

, provided, the patron places the container in the trunk area of a vehicle, or if the vehicle does not have a trunk, then the container shall be placed behind the last upright seat in the rear of the vehicle. While transporting said wine bottle the patron shall not cause the seal on said container to be removed or broken, and should such seal be so removed or broken as to allow access to the wine bottle, and/or if the bottle of wine is not placed in the area of a vehicle as required herein, then the patron shall be subject to the provisions and penalties of §

31-22-21.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 331, § 1.

3-8-17.
Possession or sale of powdered alcohol prohibited.

It is unlawful for a person, firm, or corporation to use, offer for use, purchase, offer to purchase, sell, offer to sell, or possess powdered alcohol, subject to the provisions of §

3-11-5

.

This section shall not apply to the use of powdered alcohol for bona fide research purposes by: a health care provider that operates primarily for the purpose of conducting scientific research; a state institution; a private college or university; or a pharmaceutical or biotechnology company.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 11, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 12, § 2.

3-8-18.
Possession or sale of alcohol without liquid device prohibited.

It is unlawful for a person to use, offer for use, purchase, offer to purchase, sell, offer to sell, or possess an alcohol-without-liquid device as defined in §

3-1-1

.

This section shall not apply to a healthcare provider that operates primarily for the purpose of conducting scientific research, a state institution conducting bona fide research, a private college or university conducting bona fide research, or to a pharmaceutical company or biotechnology company conducting bona fide research.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 437, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 438, § 2.